Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-1,101
Owner of premises or agent knowing of violations; penalty.

If the owner of the licensed premises or any person from whom the licensee derives the right to possession of such premises, or the agent of such owner or person, knowingly permits the licensee to use such licensed premises in violation of the terms of the Nebraska Liquor Control Act, such owner, agent, or other person shall be deemed guilty of a violation of the act to the same extent as such licensee and be subject to the same punishment.

Laws 1935, c. 116, § 64, p. 409;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 53-364;

R.S.1943, § 53-1,101;

Laws 1994, LB 859, § 11.